Massachusetts, session 194th, S2225.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The office of the inspector general, shall, subject to appropriation, convene
a special unit for the purpose of providing ongoing and comprehensive oversight of actions taken
by the commonwealth in response to the ongoing crisis attributable to the influx of migrants into
the state. Such a special unit shall identify, review, and analyze the cost and cost-effectiveness of
specialized contracts and procurements for such resources as food, and housing.
Said unit shall file reports, together with legislative and regulatory recommendations,
with the clerks of the House and Senate, the Senate and House Committees on Ways and Means,
and the Secretary of Administration and Finance quarterly, beginning not later than 3 months
following the passage of this act, for a period of not less than 3 years, unless otherwise such
requirement is otherwise modified, terminated, or extended, provided that such reports shall also
be posted electronically so as to enable public inspection.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall expire 3 years after the passage of this act.
of 1